fxpp/enhufxpp.lexc
!!enhufxpp.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  

+FXPP +1N1P +P1N1P +1N2P +P1N2P +1N3P +P1N3P 
+2N1P +P2N1P +2N2P +P2N2P +2N3P +P2N3P 
      
LEXICON Root
Nek;
Neek;
Tol;
T;
Nal;
Hoz;
Ert;
Rol;
Belol;
Bele;
Ben;
Vel;
Veele;
Ra;
Rea;
Rajta;
Alatt;
Alaa;
Alol;
Altal;
Folott;
Felett;
Folibe;
Folibee;
Folee;
Felee;
Feloel;
Feluel;
Foluel;
Kozott;
Kozee;
Kozibe;
Kozibee;
Kozul;
Kozt;
Mellett;
Mellee;
Melloel;
Utan;
Mogul;
Moge;
Mogott;
Elott;
Elol;
Ele;
Elebe;
Eleebe;
Elejbe;
Elejbee;
Elibe;
Elibee;
Nelkul;
Kivul;
Miatt;
Erett;
Irant;
Szerinte;
Kore;
Korul;
Korulott;
Korott;
Helyett;
Ellen;
Vegett;


LEXICON Nek
nek+FXPP+1N1P:nekem #;
nek+FXPP+P1N1P:énnekem #;
nek+FXPP+1N2P:neked #;
nek+FXPP+P1N2P:teneked #;
nek+FXPP+1N3P:neki #;
nek+FXPP+P1N3P:őneki #;
nek+FXPP+1N3P:nekije #;
nek+FXPP+P1N3P:őnekije #;
nek+FXPP+2N1P:nekünk #;
nek+FXPP+P2N1P:minekünk #;
nek+FXPP+2N2P:nektek #;
nek+FXPP+P2N2P:tinektek #;
nek+FXPP+2N3P:nekik #;
nek+FXPP+P2N3P:őnekik #;

LEXICON Neek
nék+FXPP+1N1P:nékem #;
nék+FXPP+P1N1P:énnékem #;
nék+FXPP+1N2P:néked #;
nék+FXPP+P1N2P:tenéked #;
nék+FXPP+1N3P:néki #;
nék+FXPP+P1N3P:őnéki #;
nék+FXPP+1N3P:nékije #;
nék+FXPP+P1N3P:őnékije #;
nék+FXPP+2N1P:nékünk #;
nék+FXPP+P2N1P:minékünk #;
nék+FXPP+2N2P:néktek #;
nék+FXPP+P2N2P:tinéktek #;
nék+FXPP+2N3P:nékik #;
nék+FXPP+P2N3P:őnékik #;

LEXICON Tol
től+FXPP+1N1P:tőlem #;
től+FXPP+P1N1P:éntőlem #;
től+FXPP+1N2P:tőled #;
től+FXPP+P1N2P:tetőled #;
től+FXPP+1N3P:tőle #;
től+FXPP+P1N3P:őtőle #;
től+FXPP+2N1P:tőlünk #;
től+FXPP+P2N1P:mitőlünk #;
től+FXPP+2N2P:tőletek #;
től+FXPP+P2N2P:titőletek #;
től+FXPP+2N3P:tőlük #;
től+FXPP+P2N3P:őtőlük #;

LEXICON T
t+FXPP+1N1P:engem #;
t+FXPP+1N1P:engemet #;
t+FXPP+1N1P:éngem #;
t+FXPP+1N1Pet:éngemet #;
t+FXPP+1N2P:téged #;
t+FXPP+1N2P:tégedet #;
t+FXPP+1N3P:őt #;
t+FXPP+1N3Pet:őtet #;
t+FXPP+2N1P:minket #;
t+FXPP+2N1P:bennünket #;
t+FXPP+2N1P:mibennünket #;
t+FXPP+2N2P:titeket #;
t+FXPP+2N2P:benneteket #;
t+FXPP+2N2P:tibenneteket #;
t+FXPP+2N3P:őket #;

LEXICON Nal
nál+FXPP+1N1P:nálam #;
nál+FXPP+P1N1P:énnálam #;
nál+FXPP+1N2P:nálad #;
nál+FXPP+P1N2P:tenálad #;
nál+FXPP+1N3P:nála #;
nál+FXPP+P1N3P:őnála #;
nál+FXPP+P1N3P:őnálánál #;
nál+FXPP+2N1P:nálunk #;
nál+FXPP+P2N1P:minálunk #;
nál+FXPP+2N2P:nálatok #;
nál+FXPP+P2N2P:tinálatok #;
nál+FXPP+2N3P:náluk #;
nál+FXPP+P2N3P:őnáluk #;

LEXICON Hoz
hoz+FXPP+1N1P:hozzám #;
hoz+FXPP+P1N1P:énhozzám #;
hoz+FXPP+1N2P:hozzád #;
hoz+FXPP+P1N2P:tehozzád #;
hoz+FXPP+1N3P:hozzá #;
hoz+FXPP+P1N3P:őhozzá #;
hoz+FXPP+1N3P:hozzája #;
hoz+FXPP+P1N3P:őhozzája #;
hoz+FXPP+2N1P:hozzánk #;
hoz+FXPP+P2N1P:mihozzánk #;
hoz+FXPP+2N2P:hozzátok #;
hoz+FXPP+P2N2P:tihozzátok #;
hoz+FXPP+2N3P:hozzájuk #;
hoz+FXPP+P2N3P:őhozzájuk #;

LEXICON Ert
ért+FXPP+1N1P:értem #;
ért+FXPP+P1N1P:énértem #;
ért+FXPP+1N2P:érted #;
ért+FXPP+P1N2P:teérted #;
ért+FXPP+1N3P:érte #;
ért+FXPP+P1N3P:őérte #;
ért+FXPP+2N1P:értünk #;
ért+FXPP+P2N1P:miértünk #;
ért+FXPP+2N2P:értetek #;
ért+FXPP+P2N2P:tiértetek #;
ért+FXPP+2N3P:értük #;
ért+FXPP+P2N3P:őértük #;

LEXICON Rol
ról+FXPP+1N1P:rólam #;
ról+FXPP+P1N1P:énrólam #;
ról+FXPP+1N2P:rólad #;
ról+FXPP+P1N2P:terólad #;
ról+FXPP+1N3P:róla #;
ról+FXPP+P1N3P:őróla #;
ról+FXPP+2N1P:rólunk #;
ról+FXPP+P2N1P:mirólunk #;
ról+FXPP+2N2P:rólatok #;
ról+FXPP+P2N2P:tirólatok #;
ról+FXPP+2N3P:róluk #;
ról+FXPP+P2N3P:őróluk #;

LEXICON Belol
belől+FXPP+1N1P:belőlem #;
belől+FXPP+P1N1P:énbelőlem #;
belől+FXPP+1N2P:belőled #;
belől+FXPP+P1N2P:tebelőled #;
belől+FXPP+1N3P:belőle #;
belől+FXPP+P1N3P:őbelőle #;
belől+FXPP+2N1P:belőlünk #;
belől+FXPP+P2N1P:mibelőlünk #;
belől+FXPP+2N2P:belőletek #;
belől+FXPP+P2N2P:tibelőletek #;
belől+FXPP+2N3P:belőlük #;
belől+FXPP+P2N3P:őbelőlük #;

LEXICON Bele
belé+FXPP+1N1P:belém #;
belé+FXPP+P1N1P:énbelém #;
belé+FXPP+1N2P:beléd #;
belé+FXPP+P1N2P:tebeléd #;
belé+FXPP+1N3P:belé #;
belé+FXPP+P1N3P:őbelé #;
belé+FXPP+1N3P:beléje #;
belé+FXPP+P1N3P:őbeléje #;
belé+FXPP+2N1P:belénk #;
belé+FXPP+P2N1P:mibelénk #;
belé+FXPP+2N2P:belétek #;
belé+FXPP+P2N2P:tibelétek #;
belé+FXPP+2N3P:beléjük #;
belé+FXPP+P2N3P:őbeléjük #;

LEXICON Ben
ben+FXPP+1N1P:bennem #;
ben+FXPP+P1N1P:énbennem #;
ben+FXPP+1N2P:benned #;
ben+FXPP+P1N2P:tebenned #;
ben+FXPP+1N3P:benne #;
ben+FXPP+P1N3P:őbenne #;
ben+FXPP+2N1P:bennünk #;
ben+FXPP+P2N1P:mibennünk #;
ben+FXPP+2N2P:bennetek #;
ben+FXPP+P2N2P:tibennetek #;
ben+FXPP+2N3P:bennük #;
ben+FXPP+P2N3P:őbennük #;

LEXICON Vel
vel+FXPP+1N1P:velem #;
vel+FXPP+P1N1P:énvelem #;
vel+FXPP+1N2P:veled #;
vel+FXPP+P1N2P:teveled #;
vel+FXPP+1N3P:vele #;
vel+FXPP+P1N3P:ővele #;
vel+FXPP+2N1P:velünk #;
vel+FXPP+P2N1P:mivelünk #;
vel+FXPP+2N2P:veletek #;
vel+FXPP+P2N2P:tiveletek #;
vel+FXPP+2N3P:velük #;
vel+FXPP+P2N3P:ővelük #;

LEXICON Veele
véle+FXPP+1N1P:vélem #;
véle+FXPP+P1N1P:énvélem #;
véle+FXPP+1N2P:véled #;
véle+FXPP+P1N2P:tevéled #;
véle+FXPP+1N3P:véle #;
véle+FXPP+P1N3P:ővéle #;
véle+FXPP+2N1P:vélünk #;
véle+FXPP+P2N1P:mivélünk #;
véle+FXPP+2N2P:véletek #;
véle+FXPP+P2N2P:tivéletek #;
véle+FXPP+2N3P:vélük #;
véle+FXPP+P2N3P:ővélük #;

LEXICON Ra
rá+FXPP+1N1P:rám #;
rá+FXPP+P1N1P:énrám #;
rá+FXPP+1N2P:rád #;
rá+FXPP+P1N2P:terád #;
rá+FXPP+1N3P:rá #;
rá+FXPP+P1N3P:őrá #;
rá+FXPP+1N3P:rája #;
rá+FXPP+P1N3P:őrája #;
rá+FXPP+2N1P:ránk #;
rá+FXPP+P2N1P:miránk #;
rá+FXPP+2N2P:rátok #;
rá+FXPP+P2N2P:tirátok #;
rá+FXPP+2N3P:rájuk #;
rá+FXPP+P2N3P:őrájuk #;

LEXICON Rea
reá+FXPP+1N1P:reám #;
reá+FXPP+P1N1P:énreám #;
reá+FXPP+1N2P:reád #;
reá+FXPP+P1N2P:tereád #;
reá+FXPP+1N3P:reá #;
reá+FXPP+P1N3P:őreá #;
reá+FXPP+1N3P:reája #;
reá+FXPP+P1N3P:őreája #;
reá+FXPP+2N1P:reánk #;
reá+FXPP+P2N1P:mireánk #;
reá+FXPP+2N2P:reátok #;
reá+FXPP+P2N2P:tireátok #;
reá+FXPP+2N3P:reájuk #;
reá+FXPP+P2N3P:őreájuk #;


LEXICON Rajta
rajta+FXPP+1N1P:rajtam #;
rajta+FXPP+P1N1P:énrajtam #;
rajta+FXPP+1N2P:rajtad #;
rajta+FXPP+P1N2P:terajtad #;
rajta+FXPP+1N3P:rajta #;
rajta+FXPP+P1N3P:őrajta #;
rajta+FXPP+2N1P:rajtunk #;
rajta+FXPP+P2N1P:mirajtunk #;
rajta+FXPP+2N2P:rajtatok #;
rajta+FXPP+P2N2P:tirajtatok #;
rajta+FXPP+2N3P:rajtuk #;
rajta+FXPP+P2N3P:őrajtuk #;

LEXICON  Alatt                 
alatt+FXPP+1N1P:alattam #;
alatt+FXPP+P1N1P:énalattam #;
alatt+FXPP+1N2P:alattad #;
alatt+FXPP+P1N2P:tealattad #;
alatt+FXPP+1N3P:alatta #;
alatt+FXPP+P1N3P:őalatta #;
alatt+FXPP+2N1P:alattunk #;
alatt+FXPP+P2N1P:mialattunk #;
alatt+FXPP+2N2P:alattatok #;
alatt+FXPP+P2N2P:tialattatok #;
alatt+FXPP+2N3P:alattuk #;
alatt+FXPP+P2N3P:őalattuk #;

LEXICON Alaa
alá+FXPP+1N1P:alám #;
alá+FXPP+P1N1P:énalám #;
alá+FXPP+1N2P:alád #;
alá+FXPP+P1N2P:tealád #;
alá+FXPP+1N3P:alája #;
alá+FXPP+1N3P:alá #;
alá+FXPP+P1N3P:őalája #;
alá+FXPP+P1N3P:őalá #;
alá+FXPP+2N1P:alánk #;
alá+FXPP+P2N1P:mialánk #;
alá+FXPP+2N2P:alátok #;
alá+FXPP+P2N2P:tialátok #;
alá+FXPP+2N3P:alájuk #;
alá+FXPP+P2N3P:őalájuk #;

LEXICON Alol
alól+FXPP+1N1P:alólam #;
alól+FXPP+P1N1P:énalólam #;
alól+FXPP+1N2P:alólad #;
alól+FXPP+P1N2P:tealólad #;
alól+FXPP+1N3P:alóla #;
alól+FXPP+P1N3P:őalóla #;
alól+FXPP+2N1P:alólunk #;
alól+FXPP+P2N1P:mialólunk #;
alól+FXPP+2N2P:alólatok #;
alól+FXPP+P2N2P:tialólatok #;
alól+FXPP+2N3P:alóluk #;
alól+FXPP+P2N3P:őalóluk #;

LEXICON Altal
által+FXPP+1N1P:általam #;
által+FXPP+P1N1P:énáltalam #;
által+FXPP+1N2P:általad #;
által+FXPP+P1N2P:teáltalad #;
által+FXPP+1N3P:általa #;
által+FXPP+P1N3P:őáltala #;
által+FXPP+2N1P:általunk #;
által+FXPP+P2N1P:miáltalunk #;
által+FXPP+2N2P:általatok #;
által+FXPP+P2N2P:tiáltalatok #;
által+FXPP+2N3P:általuk #;
által+FXPP+P2N3P:őáltaluk #;

LEXICON Folott
fölött+FXPP+1N1P:fölöttem #;
fölött+FXPP+P1N1P:énfölöttem #;
fölött+FXPP+1N2P:fölötted #;
fölött+FXPP+P1N2P:tefölötted #;
fölött+FXPP+1N3P:fölötte #;
fölött+FXPP+P1N3P:őfölötte #;
fölött+FXPP+2N1P:fölöttünk #;
fölött+FXPP+P2N1P:mifölöttünk #;
fölött+FXPP+2N2P:fölöttetek #;
fölött+FXPP+P2N2P:tifölöttetek #;
fölött+FXPP+2N3P:fölöttük #;
fölött+FXPP+P2N3P:őfölöttük #;

LEXICON Felett
felett+FXPP+1N1P:felettem #;
felett+FXPP+P1N1P:énfelettem #;
felett+FXPP+1N2P:feletted #;
felett+FXPP+P1N2P:tefeletted #;
felett+FXPP+1N3P:felette #;
felett+FXPP+P1N3P:őfelette #;
felett+FXPP+2N1P:felettünk #;
felett+FXPP+P2N1P:mifelettünk #;
felett+FXPP+2N2P:felettetek #;
felett+FXPP+P2N2P:tifelettetek #;
felett+FXPP+2N3P:felettük #;
felett+FXPP+P2N3P:őfelettük #;

LEXICON Folibe
fölibe+FXPP+1N1P:fölibem #;
fölibe+FXPP+P1N1P:énfölibem #;
fölibe+FXPP+1N2P:fölibed #;
fölibe+FXPP+P1N2P:tefölibed #;
fölibe+FXPP+1N3P:fölibe #;
fölibe+FXPP+P1N3P:őfölibe #;
fölibe+FXPP+2N1P:fölibenk #;
fölibe+FXPP+P2N1P:mifölibenk #;
fölibe+FXPP+2N2P:fölibetek #;
fölibe+FXPP+P2N2P:tifölibetek #;
fölibe+FXPP+2N3P:fölibük #;
fölibe+FXPP+P2N3P:őfölibük #;

LEXICON Folibee
fölibé+FXPP+1N1P:fölibém #;
fölibé+FXPP+P1N1P:énfölibém #;
fölibé+FXPP+1N2P:fölibéd #;
fölibé+FXPP+P1N2P:tefölibéd #;
fölibé+FXPP+1N3P:fölibé #;
fölibé+FXPP+1N3P:fölibéje #;
fölibé+FXPP+P1N3P:őfölibé #;
fölibé+FXPP+P1N3P:őfölibéje #;
fölibé+FXPP+2N1P:fölibénk #;
fölibé+FXPP+P2N1P:mifölibénk #;
fölibé+FXPP+2N2P:fölibétek #;
fölibé+FXPP+P2N2P:tifölibétek #;
fölibé+FXPP+2N3P:fölibéjük #;
fölibé+FXPP+P2N3P:őfölibéjük #;

LEXICON Folee
fölé+FXPP+1N1P:fölém #;
fölé+FXPP+P1N1P:énfölém #;
fölé+FXPP+1N2P:föléd #;
fölé+FXPP+P1N2P:teföléd #;
fölé+FXPP+1N3P:fölé #;
fölé+FXPP+1N3P:föléje #;
fölé+FXPP+P1N3P:őfölé #;
fölé+FXPP+P1N3P:őföléje #;
fölé+FXPP+2N1P:fölénk #;
fölé+FXPP+P2N1P:mifölénk #;
fölé+FXPP+2N2P:fölétek #;
fölé+FXPP+P2N2P:tifölétek #;
fölé+FXPP+2N3P:föléjük #;
fölé+FXPP+P2N3P:őföléjük #;

LEXICON Felee
felé+FXPP+1N1P:felém #;
felé+FXPP+P1N1P:énfelém #;
felé+FXPP+1N2P:feléd #;
felé+FXPP+P1N2P:tefeléd #;
felé+FXPP+1N3P:felé #;
felé+FXPP+1N3P:feléje #;
felé+FXPP+P1N3P:őfelé #;
felé+FXPP+P1N3P:őfeléje #;
felé+FXPP+2N1P:felénk #;
felé+FXPP+P2N1P:mifelénk #;
felé+FXPP+2N2P:felétek #;
felé+FXPP+P2N2P:tifelétek #;
felé+FXPP+2N3P:feléjük #;
felé+FXPP+P2N3P:őfeléjük #;

LEXICON Feloel
felől+FXPP+1N1P:felőlem #;
felől+FXPP+P1N1P:énfelőlem #;
felől+FXPP+1N2P:felőled #;
felől+FXPP+P1N2P:tefelőled #;
felől+FXPP+1N3P:felőle #;
felől+FXPP+P1N3P:őfelőle #;
felől+FXPP+2N1P:felőlünk #;
felől+FXPP+P2N1P:mifelőlünk #;
felől+FXPP+2N2P:felőletek #;
felől+FXPP+P2N2P:tifelőletek #;
felől+FXPP+2N3P:felőlük #;
felől+FXPP+P2N3P:őfelőlük #;

LEXICON Feluel
felül+FXPP+1N1P:felülem #;
felül+FXPP+P1N1P:énfelülem #;
felül+FXPP+1N2P:felüled #;
felül+FXPP+P1N2P:tefelüled #;
felül+FXPP+1N3P:felüle #;
felül+FXPP+P1N3P:őfelüle #;
felül+FXPP+2N1P:felülünk #;
felül+FXPP+P2N1P:mifelülünk #;
felül+FXPP+2N2P:felületek #;
felül+FXPP+P2N2P:tifelületek #;
felül+FXPP+2N3P:felülük #;
felül+FXPP+P2N3P:őfelülük #;

LEXICON Foluel
fölül+FXPP+1N1P:fölülem #;
fölül+FXPP+P1N1P:énfölülem #;
fölül+FXPP+1N2P:fölüled #;
fölül+FXPP+P1N2P:tefölüled #;
fölül+FXPP+1N3P:fölüle #;
fölül+FXPP+P1N3P:őfölüle #;
fölül+FXPP+2N1P:fölülünk #;
fölül+FXPP+P2N1P:mifölülünk #;
fölül+FXPP+2N2P:fölületek #;
fölül+FXPP+P2N2P:tifölületek #;
fölül+FXPP+2N3P:fölülük #;
fölül+FXPP+P2N3P:őfölülük #;

LEXICON Kozott
között+FXPP+1N1P:közöttem #;
között+FXPP+P1N1P:énközöttem #;
között+FXPP+1N2P:közötted #;
között+FXPP+P1N2P:teközötted #;
között+FXPP+1N3P:közötte #;
között+FXPP+P1N3P:őközötte #;
között+FXPP+2N1P:közöttünk #;
között+FXPP+P2N1P:miközöttünk #;
között+FXPP+2N2P:közöttetek #;
között+FXPP+P2N2P:tiközöttetek #;
között+FXPP+2N3P:közöttük #;
között+FXPP+P2N3P:őközöttük #;

LEXICON Kozee
közé+FXPP+1N1P:közém #;
közé+FXPP+P1N1P:énközém #;
közé+FXPP+1N2P:közéd #;
közé+FXPP+P1N2P:teközéd #;
közé+FXPP+1N3P:közé #;
közé+FXPP+P1N3P:őközé #;
közé+FXPP+1N3P:közéje #;
közé+FXPP+P1N3P:őközéje #;
közé+FXPP+2N1P:közénk #;
közé+FXPP+P2N1P:miközénk #;
közé+FXPP+2N2P:közétek #;
közé+FXPP+P2N2P:tiközétek #;
közé+FXPP+2N3P:közéjük #;
közé+FXPP+P2N3P:őközéjük #;

LEXICON Kozibe
közibe+FXPP+1N1P:közibem #;
közibe+FXPP+P1N1P:énközibem #;
közibe+FXPP+1N2P:közibed #;
közibe+FXPP+P1N2P:teközibed #;
közibe+FXPP+1N3P:közibe #;
közibe+FXPP+P1N3P:őközibe #;
közibe+FXPP+2N1P:közibünk #;
közibe+FXPP+P2N1P:miközibünk #;
közibe+FXPP+2N2P:közibetek #;
közibe+FXPP+P2N2P:tiközibetek #;
közibe+FXPP+2N3P:közibük #;
közibe+FXPP+P2N3P:őközibük #;
